Washington statutes.
RCW 28B.10.151

Diversity, equity, inclusion, and antiracism—Reports.

By December 31, 2024, and biennially thereafter, the state board for community and technical colleges and an organization representing the presidents of the public four-year institutions of higher education shall each submit a report to the higher education committees of the legislature in accordance with RCW 43.01.036 for their respective institutions of higher education. The reports must include the following:

(1) Information on the professional development programs implemented by each institution of higher education, including updates on progress towards meeting the goal outlined in section 1, chapter 275, Laws of 2021;

(2) A summary of results of the campus climate assessments and other relevant information received by the institutions of higher education; and

(3) By December 31, 2026, and biennially thereafter, the reports must also include information on the student diversity, equity, inclusion, and antiracism programs implemented by each institution of higher education.

[ 2021 c 275 s 5.]

NOTES:

Findings—Intent—Conflict with federal requirements—2021 c 275: See notes following RCW 28B.10.145.